Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-3315
Additions; lots; sale before platting; penalty.

Any person who sells or offers for sale or lease any lots in any municipality or addition to any municipality, before the plat of such lots has been duly acknowledged and recorded as provided in section 18-3305, shall pay a penalty of fifty dollars for each lot or part of lot sold, leased, or offered for sale.

Laws 1879, § 116, p. 237;

R.S.1913, § 5104;

C.S.1922, § 4277;

C.S.1929, § 17-426;

R.S.1943, § 17-426;

R.S.1943, (2012), § 17-426;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 326.

Platting is required before county board can establish a village. State ex rel. Schoonover v. Crabill, 136 Neb. 819, 287 N.W. 669 (1939).